Utah statutes.
63G-7-603.   Exemplary or punitive damages prohibited -- Governmental entity exempt from execution, attachment, or garnishment.

(1) (a)  A judgment may not be rendered against a governmental entity for exemplary or punitive damages.

(b)  If a governmental entity would be required to pay the judgment under Section 63G-7-902 or 63G-7-903, the governmental entity shall pay any judgment or portion of any judgment entered against its employee in the employee's personal capacity even if the judgment is for or includes exemplary or punitive damages.

(2)  Execution, attachment, or garnishment may not issue against a governmental entity.

